Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 2. Form of Medical Records.

Sec. 18.23.100.
Use of electronic medical records.

A health care provider may maintain and preserve its medical records in an electronic format that protects the physical security of the records and protects the records from access by unauthorized persons. A health care provider who maintains and preserves the records in an electronic format that provides these protections is not required to maintain a separate paper copy. The Department of Health and Social Services may adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) to regulate the implementation of this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 39 SLA 1995)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

18.95.010

. Renumbered in 1995.

Administrative Code. —

For methadone programs, see 7 AAC 33.

For mental health clinic services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 15.

For substance abuse rehabilitative services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 18.

For standards for operation of a community mental health center, see 7 AAC 71, art. 3.

For submission of information, see 7 AAC 85, art. 1.

For use, disclosure, and access, see 7 AAC 85, art. 2.

For electronic medical records, see 7 AAC 85, art. 3.

For security, see 7 AAC 85, art. 4.